test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-outoo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - outō: # Noun 90 'eng /est auto/fin' - full paradigm
     outō+N+Sg+Nom: outō
     outō+N+Sg+Gen: outō
     outō+N+Sg+Par: outō
     outō+N+Sg+Dat: outōn
     outō+N+Sg+Ins: outōks
     outō+N+Sg+Ill: [outōz, outō]
     outō+N+Sg+Ela: outōst
     outō+N+Pl+Nom: outōd
     outō+N+Pl+Gen: outōd
     outō+N+Pl+Par: outīdi
     outō+N+Pl+Dat: outōdõn
     outō+N+Pl+Ins: outōdõks
     outō+N+Pl+Ill: outīž
     outō+N+Pl+Ela: outīst
